Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-814
Administration; bylaws; attach to deed.

The administration of every building constituted into condominium property shall be governed by bylaws which shall be inserted in or appended to and recorded with the master deed.

Laws 1963, c. 429, § 14, p. 1441.